th: ประเภทการใช้งานผ้าแฟลนเนล: ตัดเย็บเครื่องแต่งกาย; ผ้าห่มเด็กอ่อน/ผ้าห่อตัวทารก; ทำผ้าห่ม/ผ้าคลุม; งานฝีมือ/งานเย็บทั่วไป; ซับใน; ตัดเย็บชุดนอน/ชุดใส่อยู่บ้าน; งานควิลท์; ตัดเย็บเสื้อเชิ้ต; หุ้มเบาะ/ตกแต่ง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta uporabe flanela: Šivanje odjeće; Dječje deke / dekice za bebe; Izrada deka i prekrivača; Rukotvorine / opće šivanje; Podstava; Šivanje pidžama i kućne odjeće; Prošivanje; Tkanina za košulje; Tapeciranje / dekor; Ostalo
ro-RO: Tipul de utilizare a flanelei: Cusut de îmbrăcăminte; Pături pentru bebeluși/de înfășat; Confecționare de pături/pleduri; Artizanat/cusut general; Căptușeală; Cusut de pijamale/îmbrăcăminte de casă; Matlasare; Cămăși; Tapițerie/decor; Altele
zh-TW: 法蘭絨用途類型: 服飾縫紉; 嬰兒 / 包巾毛毯; 毛毯 / 披毯製作; 手工藝 / 一般縫紉; 內裡; 睡衣 / 居家服縫紉; 絎縫 / 拼布; 襯衫布料; 傢飾布 / 裝飾; 其他
pl: Typ zastosowania flaneli: Szycie odzieży; Kocyki dziecięce/otulacze; Szycie koców/narzut; Rękodzieło/szycie ogólne; Podszewka; Szycie piżam/odzieży domowej; Pikowanie; Szycie koszul; Tapicerstwo/dekoracje; Inne
es: Tipo de uso de la franela: Costura de ropa; Mantas de bebé/recepción; Confección de mantas/cubrecamas; Manualidades/costura general; Forro; Costura de pijamas/ropa de casa; Acolchado; Confección de camisas; Tapicería/decoración; Otro
tr: Flanel kullanım türü: Giysi dikimi; Bebek/kundak battaniyeleri; Battaniye/kırlent yapımı; El işi/genel dikiş; Astar; Pijama/ev giyimi dikimi; Kapitone; Gömleklik; Döşeme/dekor; Diğer
sv: Användningstyp för flanell: Sömnad av kläder; Baby-/snuttefiltar; Tillverkning av filtar/plädar; Pyssel/allmän sömnad; Foder; Sömnad av pyjamas/myskläder; Quiltning; Skjortsömnad; Möbeltapetsering/inredning; Övrigt
sk-SK: Typ použitia flanelu: Šitie oblečenia; Novorodenecké deky a zavinovačky; Výroba prikrývok/dieky; Ručné práce a bežné šitie; Podšívka; Šitie pyžám a domáceho oblečenia; Prešívanie (Quilting); Šitie košieľ; Čalúnenie a dekorácie; Iné
pt-BR: Tipo de uso da flanela: Costura de vestuário; Mantas de bebê/cueiros; Confecção de cobertores/mantas; Artesanato/costura geral; Forro; Costura de pijamas/roupas de dormir; Quilting; Camisaria; Estofamento/decoração; Outros
cs: Typ použití flanelu: Šití oděvů; Dětské přikrývky / zavinovačky; Výroba dek a přehozů; Ruční práce / obecné šití; Podšívka; Šití pyžam / domácího oblečení; Patchwork (quilting); Košiloviny; Čalounění/dekorace; Jiné
lt-LT: Flanelės naudojimo tipas: Drabužių siuvimas; Kūdikių antklodės / vystyklai; Antklodžių / pledų gamyba; Rankdarbiai / bendrasis siuvimas; Pamušalai; Pižamų / laisvalaikio drabužių siuvimas; Skiautinių siuvimas; Marškinių siuvimas; Baldų apmušalai / dekoras; Kita
sl-SI: Vrsta uporabe flanele: Šivanje oblačil; Odeje za dojenčke/zavijanje; Izdelava odej/pregrinjal; Rokodelstvo/Splošno šivanje; Podloga; Šivanje pižam/oblačil za prosti čas; Prešivanje; Srajčno blago; Tapetništvo/Dekor; Drugo
fi: Flanellin käyttötyyppi: Vaatteiden ompelu; Vauvanpeitot / kapaloliinat; Peittojen/torkkupeittojen valmistus; Askartelu / yleinen ompelu; Vuori; Pyjamien/olovaatteiden ompelu; Tilkkutyöt; Paitojen ompelu; Verhoilu/sisustus; Muu
ja: フランネル使用タイプ: アパレル縫製; ベビー/おくるみ用ブランケット; ブランケット/スロー作り; クラフト/一般縫製; 裏地; パジャマ/ルームウェア縫製; キルティング; シャツ地; 室内装飾/インテリア; その他
de: Verwendungsart des Flanells: Nähen von Bekleidung; Baby-/Einwickeldecken; Decken-/Überwurfherstellung; Basteln/Allgemeines Nähen; Futterstoff; Nähen von Schlafanzügen/Loungewear; Quilten; Hemdenstoff; Polsterung/Dekor; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de utilização de flanela: Costura de vestuário; Mantas para bebé; Confecionamento de cobertores/mantas; Trabalhos manuais/costura em geral; Forro; Costura de pijamas/roupa de estar em casa; Acolchoamento; Camisaria; Estofos/decoração; Outro
it: Tipo di utilizzo della flanella: Cucito per abbigliamento; Coperte per neonati; Creazione di coperte/plaid; Artigianato/cucito generico; Fodera; Cucito per pigiami/abbigliamento da casa; Trapuntatura; Camiceria; Tappezzeria/arredamento; Altro
fr: Usage prévu de la flanelle: Couture de vêtements; Couvertures pour bébés/de réception; Confection de couvertures/plaids; Artisanat/couture générale; Doublure; Couture de pyjamas/vêtements de détente; Matelassage; Tissu pour chemises; Rembourrage/décoration; Autre
ru: Тип применения фланели: Пошив одежды; Детские/пеленальные одеяла; Пошив одеял/пледов; Рукоделие/общее шитье; Подкладка; Пошив пижам/домашней одежды; Квилтинг (лоскутное шитье); Пошив рубашек; Обивка/декор; Другое
nl: Flanel gebruikstype: Kleding maken; Baby-/wikkeldekentjes; Dekens/plaids maken; Knutselen/algemeen naaiwerk; Voering; Pyjama's/loungewear naaien; Quilten; Hemdenstof; Stoffering/decoratie; Overige
zh-CN: 法兰绒用途类型: 服装缝纫; 婴儿/包被; 毯子/披风制作; 手工/普通缝纫; 衬里; 睡衣/家居服缝纫; 绗缝; 衬衫面料; 室内装潢/装饰; 其他
nb: Flanellbrukstype: Søm av klær; Babytepper; Laging av tepper / pledd; Hobby / generell søm; Fôr; Søm av pysjamas / koseklær; Quilting; Skjortestoff; Møbeltrekk / dekor; Annet
ko: 플란넬 용도 유형: 의류 재봉; 유아/신생아용 블랭킷; 담요/스로우 제작; 공예/일반 재봉; 안감; 파자마/라운지웨어 재봉; 퀼팅; 셔츠용 원단; 실내장식/데코; 기타
hu: Flanel felhasználási típusa: Ruhavarrás; Baba- / pólyatakarók; Takaró- / plédkészítés; Kézműveskedés / általános varrás; Bélés; Pizsama- / otthoniruha-varrás; Foltvarrás; Inganyag; Kárpitozás / dekoráció; Egyéb
el: Τύπος χρήσης φανέλας: Ράψιμο ρούχων; Βρεφικές κουβέρτες/αγκαλιάς; Κατασκευή για κουβέρτες/ριχτάρια; Χειροτεχνίες/γενική ραπτική; Φόδρα; Ράψιμο για πιτζάμες/ρούχα σπιτιού; Πάτσγουορκ (quilting); Ύφασμα για πουκάμισα; Ταπετσαρία/διακόσμηση; Άλλο
vi: Loại sử dụng vải nỉ: May trang phục; Chăn quấn/chăn cho em bé; Làm chăn/mền; Thủ công/may vá chung; Lớp lót; May đồ ngủ/đồ mặc nhà; Chần bông; May áo sơ mi; Bọc nội thất/trang trí; Khác
en: Flannel use type: Apparel sewing; Baby/receiving blankets; Blanket/throw making; Crafting/general sewing; Lining; Pajama/loungewear sewing; Quilting; Shirting; Upholstery/decor; Other
da: Anvendelse af flannel: Syning af beklædning; Baby-/svøbningstæpper; Fremstilling af tæpper/plaider; Hobby/generel syning; Foring; Syning af pyjamas/loungewear; Quiltning; Skjortestof; Møbelpolstring/indretning; Andet
bg-BG: Тип предназначение на фланела: Шиене на облекло; Бебешки одеяла; Изработка на одеяла / покривала; Занаяти / общо шиене; Подплата; Шиене на пижами / домашно облекло; Капитониране; За ризи; Тапицерия / декор; Друго